Washington statutes.
RCW 18.74.120

Record of proceedings—Register.

The secretary of health shall keep a record of proceedings under this chapter and a register of all persons licensed under it. The register shall show the name of every living licensed physical therapist and physical therapist assistant, his or her last known place of residence, and the date and number of his or her license as a physical therapist or physical therapist assistant.

[ 2007 c 98 s 11; 1991 c 3 s 183; 1983 c 116 s 21; 1979 c 158 s 63; 1977 c 75 s 11; 1949 c 239 s 12; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 10163-12.]